Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 36.1 Fuel Use Reporting Law

31-36.1-1.
Statement of purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to assure the payment of tax on fuel consumed by motor carriers in propelling qualified motor vehicles on the public highways in Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 220, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 22, § 1.

31-36.1-2.
Definitions.

Terms used in this chapter shall be construed to have the meanings provided for in §

31-36-1

and as follows:

“Administrator” means the tax administrator.

“Bond” means:

A bond duly executed by a motor carrier as principal with a corporate surety qualified under the provisions of the laws of this state, which bond shall be payable to this state, conditioned upon the basic performance of all requirements of this chapter, including the payment of all taxes, penalties and other obligations of the motor carrier arising out of this tax; or

A deposit with the state treasury by the motor carrier under any terms and conditions that the administrator may prescribe, in like amount of lawful money of the United States or bonds, or other obligations of the United States, this state, or any county of this state, of an actual market value not less than the amount so fixed by the administrator.

“Jurisdiction” means a state of the United States of America, the District of Columbia, a province or territory of Canada, or a state of the United Mexican States.

“Motor carrier” means every person, association of persons, firm, or corporation, or any other legal entity, wherever resident or located, who operates or causes to be operated qualified motor vehicles on the public highways of this state.

“Qualified motor vehicles” means a motor vehicle used, designed or maintained for transportation of persons or property and:

Having two (2) axles and a gross vehicle weight or registered gross vehicle weight exceeding twenty-six thousand pounds (26,000 lbs.) or 11,797 kilograms; or

Having three (3) or more axles regardless of weight; or

Is used in combination, when the weight of such combination exceeds twenty-six thousand pounds (26,000 lbs.) or 11,797 kilograms gross vehicle or registered gross vehicle weight. Qualified motor vehicle does not include recreational vehicles.

“Recreational vehicle” means vehicles such as motor homes, pickup trucks with attached campers, and buses when used exclusively for personal pleasure by an individual. In order to qualify as a recreational vehicle, the vehicle shall not be used in connection with any business endeavor.

“Use” means the consumption by a motor carrier of fuels in the propulsion of qualified motor vehicles over the highways of this state unless the fuel consumed is specifically excluded by law from the tax.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 220, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 307, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 173, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 22, § 1.

31-36.1-3.
Motor carrier license and identification — Temporary licenses.

Each carrier operating a qualified motor vehicle in two (2) or more jurisdictions shall apply to the administrator for a motor carrier fuel use license upon forms approved by the administrator and there shall be no fee for this license. The license shall remain in effect until surrendered or revoked under the provisions of §

31-36.1-4

. The tax administrator shall, in addition, provide identification devices in the quantity requested to each licensed motor carrier. One such device must be displayed on the exterior portion of each side of the cab of each qualified motor vehicle. Identification devices shall be issued each year by the administrator and shall be displayed on or before March 1.

The administrator may refuse to issue a license if the application for it:

Is filed by a motor carrier whose license at any time theretofore has been revoked by the administrator.

Contains any misrepresentation, misstatement, or omission of material information required by the application.

Is filed by some other motor carrier as a subterfuge of the real motor carrier in interest whose license or registration previously has been revoked for cause by the administrator.

Is filed by any motor carrier who is delinquent in the payment of any fee, tax, penalty, or other amount due the administrator for its account.

The finding may be made by the administrator after granting the applicant a hearing of which the applicant shall be given ten (10) days’ notice in writing, and in which the applicant shall have the right to appear in person or by counsel and present testimony.

Temporary license. Upon application to the administrator, an unlicensed motor carrier may obtain a temporary license which will authorize one qualified motor vehicle to be operated on the highways of this state, for a period not to exceed ten (10) days, without compliance with the fees imposed in this section, the tax imposed in §

31-36.1-5

, and the bond required in §

31-36.1-6

. There shall be no fee for this license.

The administrator may adopt rules and regulations specifying the conditions under which temporary licenses will be issued and providing for their issuance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 220, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 307, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 18, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 22, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 3, § 3.

31-36.1-4.
Motor carrier license and identification revocation.

The administrator may revoke the license and identification devices of a motor carrier which refuses or neglects to comply with any provision of this chapter or any regulation pursuant to this chapter. Before revoking the license and identification devices, the administrator shall send notice by registered or certified mail to the licensee at his or her address of record ordering the licensee to appear in the office of the administrator on a date not less than ten (10) days after mailing the notice, and show cause why the licensee’s license and identification devices should not be revoked.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 220, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 22, § 1.

31-36.1-5.
Imposition of tax.

There is levied and imposed upon motor carriers a tax at the rate specified in §

31-36-7

on the use of fuel for the propulsion of qualified motor vehicles on the public highways within this state. The tax, with respect to fuel purchased instate, shall be paid at the time of purchase as provided in chapter 36 of this title. The tax, with respect to fuel purchased outside this state shall be paid when the quarterly returns required in §

31-36.1-11

are filed with the administrator.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 220, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 427, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 22, § 1.

31-36.1-6.
Bond requirement.

Notwithstanding provisions to the contrary, the tax administrator, pursuant to rules and regulations adopted by the tax administrator, in his or her discretion, may require a motor carrier to post a bond. Such bond shall be consistent with the provisions of the International Fuel Tax Agreement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 220, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 44, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 22, § 1.

31-36.1-7.
Discharge of surety.

Any surety on a bond furnished by a motor carrier shall be discharged from any liability to the state accruing on the bond after expiration of sixty (60) days from the date which the surety shall have filed with the administrator a written request to be released and discharged, but not from liability already accrued before the expiration of the sixty (60) day period. The administrator, upon receipt of the request, shall promptly notify the motor carrier who furnished the bond in question. Unless the motor carrier, prior to the expiration of the sixty (60) day period, files a new bond satisfactory to the administrator, the administrator shall immediately revoke the motor carrier’s license and identification devices.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 220, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 22, § 1.

31-36.1-8.
Records.

Each motor carrier shall make available in this state and retain for a period of not less than four (4) years, any records that may be prescribed and in the manner required by the administrator or the International Fuel Tax Agreement, as are reasonably necessary to substantiate the quarterly returns required by §

31-36.1-11

. The administrator or the administrator’s agents may examine the books, papers, records, and equipment of any motor carrier during normal business hours in order to determine whether the motor fuel taxes due under this chapter are properly reported and paid. If the records required by this section are not maintained instate, the motor carrier shall either produce the records at a point instate for audit purposes, or provide transportation and reasonable substance for an auditor to audit the records at that point where the records are maintained by the motor carrier.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 220, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 22, § 1.

31-36.1-9.
Enforcement powers of the administrator.

The administrator may, in the enforcement of this chapter, hold hearings and take testimony, and for those purposes may issue subpoenas and compel attendance of witnesses, and may conduct investigations which the administrator deems necessary.

The tax administrator is authorized to avail him or herself of the services of the state police, the department of revenue, and the public utilities commission in enforcing the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 220, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 307, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 25; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 25.

31-36.1-10.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 220, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 22, § 1, effective June 30, 2006.

31-36.1-11.
Return requirements.

Every motor carrier subject to the tax imposed by this chapter shall on or before the last day of April, July, October, and January of every year make to the administrator any returns of its operations during the quarter ending the last day of the preceding month that the administrator may require and any other reports from time to time that the administrator may deem necessary.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 220, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 18, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 173, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 22, § 1.

31-36.1-12.
Inspection of books and records by administrator — Agreements with other jurisdictions for cooperative audits.

The tax administrator and the administrator’s authorized agents and representatives may, at any reasonable time, inspect the books and records of any motor carrier subject to the tax imposed by this chapter. The administrator may enter into agreements with the appropriate authorities of other jurisdictions having statutes similar to this chapter for the cooperative audit of motor carrier reports and returns.

In performing the audit or part of it, the officers and employees of the other jurisdiction or jurisdictions shall be deemed authorized agents of this state for that purpose, and the audits or parts of it shall have the same effect as similar audits or parts of them made by the division of taxation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 220, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 22, § 1.

31-36.1-13.
Computation of tax by administrator.

If the administrator is not satisfied with any report or return of a motor carrier subject to the tax imposed by this chapter, or with the amount of the tax to be paid by the motor carrier, the administrator may compute and assess the amount of the tax on the basis of facts contained in the report and return or on the basis of any other information available to the administrator. One or more deficiency assessments may be made with respect to any return for the tax imposed by this chapter.

The amount of the deficiency assessment, exclusive of penalties, shall bear interest at the annual rate provided by §

44-1-7

, as amended, from the last day of the month succeeding the quarterly period for which the amount of any portion of it should have been returned until the date of payment.

If any part of the deficiency for which a deficiency assessment is made is due to negligence or intentional disregard of the provisions of this chapter, a penalty of ten percent (10%) of the amount of the deficiency assessment shall be added to it. If any part of the deficiency for which a deficiency assessment is made is due to fraud or intent to evade the provisions of this chapter, a penalty of fifty percent (50%) of the amount of the deficiency assessment shall be added to it.

The administrator shall give written notice to any motor carrier of the deficiency assessment. If the notice is served by mail, it shall be addressed to the motor carrier at the address appearing in the records of the division of taxation. Except in the case of fraud, intent to evade the provisions of this chapter, or failure to submit a return, the notice of a deficiency assessment shall be mailed within three (3) years after the last day of the month following the quarterly period for which the amount is assessed or within three (3) years after the return for the period is filed, whichever is later.

If, prior to the expiration of the time prescribed in subsection (d) of this section for the mailing of the notice of a deficiency assessment, the taxpayer has consented in writing to the mailing of notice after that time, the notice may be mailed at any time prior to the expiration of the period agreed upon for the mailing. The period agreed upon may be extended by subsequent agreements in writing made before the expiration of the period.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 220, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 388, § 13; P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 22, § 1.

31-36.1-14.
Average consumption.

In the absence of adequate records or other evidence satisfactory to the administrator, showing the number of miles operated by a motor carrier’s qualified motor vehicles per gallon of motor fuel, the motor vehicle shall be deemed to have consumed one gallon of motor fuel for each four (4) miles operated, as prescribed by the International Fuel Tax Agreement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 220, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 22, § 1.

31-36.1-15.
Credit on tax — Refund.

Every motor carrier shall be entitled to a credit on the tax equivalent to the rate per gallon of the tax in effect under chapter 36 of this title, on all motor fuel purchased by the carrier within this state for use in its operations without this state and upon which motor fuel the tax imposed by the laws of this state has been paid by the carrier. Evidence of the payment of the tax in any form that may be required by, or is satisfactory to, the state tax administrator, shall, be furnished by the carrier claiming the credit allowed in this chapter.

When the amount of the credit provided in this chapter, to which any motor carrier is entitled for any quarter exceeds the amount of the tax for which the carrier is liable for the same quarter, the excess may, under the regulations of the tax administrator and the International Fuel Tax Agreement be allowed as a credit on the tax for which the carrier would be otherwise liable for any of the eight (8) succeeding quarters.

The licensee shall receive, on request, a cash refund of any accumulated credits. All requests for refunds of credit balances must be filed in writing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 220, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 427, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 22, § 1.

31-36.1-16.
Reciprocity.

The tax administrator may enter the International Fuel Tax Agreement or other cooperative compacts or agreements with other states or jurisdictions to permit base state or base jurisdiction licensing of persons using motor fuel in this state. Those agreements may provide for the cooperation and assistance among member states in the administration and collection of motor fuel tax, including, but not limited to, exchanges of information, auditing and assessing of interstate carriers and suppliers, and any other activities necessary to further uniformity.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 220, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 165, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 22, § 1.

31-36.1-17.
Penalties.

Any motor carrier failing to secure or display upon demand the license or identification device required in §

31-36.1-3

, or under the International Fuel Tax Agreement shall be guilty of a civil violation and subject to a fine not exceeding: (1) eighty-five dollars ($85.00) for the first offense and (2) not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) for subsequent offenses. Any motor carrier willfully violating any other provisions of this chapter shall be deemed guilty of a civil violation and subject to a fine not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) for the first offense and not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) for subsequent offenses.

Filing of a false statement to obtain credit or refund. Any person who willfully and knowingly makes a false statement orally, in writing, or in the form of a receipt for the sale of motor fuel, for the purpose of obtaining, attempting to obtain, or to assist any other person, partnership, or corporation to obtain or attempt to obtain a credit or refund or reduction of liability for taxes under this chapter, shall be fined not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or be imprisoned not more than one year, or both.

Failure to file return or pay tax. When any motor carrier fails to file a return within the time prescribed by this chapter for the filing of it or fails to pay the amount of taxes due when they are payable, a penalty of ten percent (10%) or fifty dollars ($50.00), whichever is greater, shall be added to the amount of the tax due, and the penalty shall immediately accrue, and the tax shall bear interest at the annual rate provided by §

44-1-7

, as amended, until the tax is paid. The tax administrator may waive all or part of the penalties provided in this chapter when it is proved to the tax administrator’s satisfaction that the failure to file the return or pay the taxes on time was due to reasonable cause.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 220, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 103, § 12; P.L. 1992, ch. 388, § 13; P.L. 1996, ch. 173, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 6, § 15; P.L. 2002, ch. 58, § 9; P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 22, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 12, § 13.

31-36.1-18.
Disposition of proceeds.

All money collected under the provisions of this chapter shall be deposited in the intermodal surface transportation fund as established in §

31-36-20

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 220, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 22, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 13, § 8.

31-36.1-19.
Out-of-state vehicles.

When under the laws of any other jurisdiction, any tax, license, fee, or other obligation in addition to any imposed by Rhode Island, are imposed on motor vehicles registered in Rhode Island, the same tax, license, fee, or other obligation may be imposed on vehicles from those states by Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 220, § 1.